Massachusetts, session 194th, H1701.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 59. Any person who, in violation of chapter 94C, manufactures, distributes, or
dispenses heroin, fentanyl, methamphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, phencyclidine (PCP)
or any other controlled substance in Class A, Class B, or Class C, as set forth at section 31 of
chapter 94C, is strictly liable for a death which results from the injection, inhalation or ingestion
of that substance, and shall be punished by imprisonment for life or for any term of years as the
court may order, and by a fine of not more than $25,000; provided, however, that the sentence of
imprisonment imposed upon such person shall not be reduced to less than 5 years, nor
suspended, nor shall any such person be eligible for probation, parole or furlough or receive a
of 2

deduction from his or her sentence for good conduct until such person shall have served 5 years
of such sentence.
For purposes of this section, a person’s act of manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing a
substance is the cause of a death when:
(a) The injection, inhalation or ingestion of the substance is an antecedent but for which
the death would not have occurred; and
(b) The death was proximately caused by a person who manufactured, distributed, or
dispensed such substance.
It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section that the decedent contributed
to his or her own death by such decedent’s purposeful, knowing, reckless or negligent injection,
inhalation or ingestion of the substance or by such decedent’s consenting to the administration of
the substance by another. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude or limit any other
prosecution for homicide.
of 2